Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-192
Wheeler.

The county of Wheeler is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of township twenty-one, north, of range nine, west of the sixth principal meridian; running thence north to the northeast corner of township twenty-four, north, of range nine, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township twenty-four, north, of range twelve, west; thence south to the southwest corner of township twenty-one, north, of range twelve, west; thence east to the place of beginning.

Laws 1877, § 2, p. 211;

R.S.1913, § 907;

C.S.1922, § 809;

C.S.1929, § 25-196;

R.S.1943, § 22-192.